dev/apertium-urd.urd.dix
    <pardef n="س/ونگھنا__vblex_caus2">
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوانا</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوانے</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواؤں</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوائیں</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواؤں</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوائیں</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواؤ</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواؤ</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواؤ</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواؤ</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوا</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواؤ</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوا</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواؤ</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواؤ</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوائیے</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوائیں</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوائیے</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوائیں</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواؤ</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوائیے</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوائیں</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوائیے</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوائیں</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوائے</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوائیں</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوائے</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوائیں</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوائے</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوائیں</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوائے</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھوائیں</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتا</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتے</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتی</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتیں</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتے</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتے</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتی</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتیں</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتیں</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتا</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتے</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتی</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتیں</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتے</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتے</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتی</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتیں</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتیں</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتا</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتے</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتی</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتیں</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتا</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتے</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نگھواتی</l><r>ونگھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="سونگھنا"><i>س</i><par n="س/ونگھنا__vblex_caus2"/></e>
